Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5097YH (5) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2014 Section 1. Section 598.21C, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0l. Changes in the physical care or 3 visitation ordered by the court pursuant to section 598.41, 4 subsection 8A. 5 Sec. 2. Section 598.41, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 8A. a. Notwithstanding any other provision 8 of this section to the contrary, a child who is sixteen years 9 of age or older shall have the right to request a hearing to 10 modify an order issued by a court establishing physical care of 11 the child, visitation rights, or both, to the child. 12 b. At a hearing under paragraph âaâ , a court shall modify 13 the order establishing physical care of the child, visitation 14 rights, or both as appropriate to grant the childâs preference 15 for physical care of the child, visitation rights, or both, 16 unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that 17 any of the following circumstances exist: 18 (1) The childâs preference is a result of coercion. 19 (2) The child would be in imminent danger if the court 20 grants the childâs preference. 21 (3) Either of the childâs parents would be effectively 22 prohibited from exercising the parentâs right to raise 23 the child. When determining whether the parent would be 24 effectively prohibited from exercising the parentâs right to 25 raise the child, the court shall consider all of the following: 26 (a) How often each parent would be able to visit the child 27 if the court granted the childâs preference. 28 (b) How often each parent has violated any existing orders 29 establishing physical care of the child and visitation rights. 30 (c) Each parentâs ability to make decisions affecting the 31 childâs education, health care, and other significant life 32 choices as compared to the other parent. 33 (d) Each parentâs ability to spend time with the child 34 without significantly disrupting the childâs established 35 -1- LSB 5097YH (5) 91 dg/ko 1/ 2 H.F. 2014 routine. 1 (e) Other factors the court deems relevant. 2 c. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit a 3 courtâs authority to enter protective orders or other orders 4 necessary to protect the welfare of a child. 5 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 6 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 7